Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Kentucky Native American Heritage Commission

171.820.
Kentucky Native American Heritage Commission — Members — Officers — Meetings — Funding.

The Kentucky Native American Heritage Commission is hereby established to promote, in partnership with the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, awareness of significant Native American influences within the historical and cultural experiences of Kentucky.

The membership of the commission shall consist of seventeen (17) members who derive from geographically diverse areas of the state and who represent various heritage interests as follows:

The secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, or the secretary’s designee;

Three (3) members from institutions of higher learning;

Two (2) members from the preservation or archeological communities;

One (1) member from the arts community; and

Ten (10) members from the public at large, eight (8) of whom shall be of Native American heritage.

Members listed in paragraphs (b) to (e) of subsection (2) of this section shall be appointed by the Governor and shall serve for terms of four (4) years. Any vacancy shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Commission members shall receive no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

From the commission membership, the Governor shall appoint a chair and vice chair of the commission. The commission may elect by majority vote other officers deemed necessary.

The commission shall meet at least three (3) times per year. Notice of the time and location of each meeting shall be provided in writing to each member at least ten (10) days in advance of the meeting.

A majority of the members present shall constitute a quorum.

Committees may be formed at the discretion of the chair.

The commission may seek and accept grants or raise funds from any available source, public or private, to accomplish its duties and responsibilities.

The commission shall be attached for administrative purposes to the Kentucky Heritage Council, whose responsibilities shall include but not be limited to designating a staff person to coordinate commission staff needs and providing other staff and services as needed for the commission to perform its duties under KRS

171.822

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 49, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2009). 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 16, relating to the creation and organization of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.

171.822.
Duties of Kentucky Native American Heritage Commission.

The duties of the Kentucky Native American Heritage Commission shall be to:

Advise the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, the Kentucky Heritage Council, and the Kentucky General Assembly on matters relating to Native American heritage;

Encourage other public and private agencies within the areas of the arts, humanities, and sciences to incorporate the Native American influence when developing programs on the history and heritage of Kentucky;

Represent a network of groups and individuals interested, or actively involved, in promoting awareness of Native American heritage in Kentucky;

Support the preservation, conservation, and interpretation of significant buildings, sites, structures, documents, artifacts, and lifestyles that represent and embody Native American heritage; and

Recognize and sanction projects that advance wider knowledge of Native Americans’ contributions to, and influence and impact on, life in Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 49, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2009, ch. 16, § 52, effective June 25, 2009.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/20/2005). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11,
85,
95,
97,
98,
99,
123, and
181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. Such a correction has been made in this section.